Mississippi, session 2026, HB4143.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Leporion Versell of Hinds County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of his conviction for the crime of Robbery in Hinds County, on July 13, 1999, for which he was sentenced to serve five (5) years in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections.  He was released from custody on February 21, 2003, and discharged on August 24, 2003.  He violated probation, it was revoked and he was sentenced on November 8, 2004, to serve one (1) year in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections. He was released on July 25, 2005, and discharged on September 6, 2005.  The Legislature is informed that he has since conducted himself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.